Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-329
Judicial review;
effect of decision on other structures.

In any
case in which airport zoning regulations adopted under the Airport Zoning Act, although generally reasonable,
are held by a court to interfere with the use or enjoyment of a particular
structure or parcel of land to such an extent or to be so onerous in their
application to such a structure or parcel of land as to constitute a taking or deprivation of
that property in violation of the Constitution of Nebraska or
the Constitution of the United States, such holding shall not affect the application
of such regulations to other structures and parcels of land.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 11(6), p. 690;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 18.